Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
General Provisions
§ 25-3-37.
Salaries to be full compensation.

It is expressly provided that the salaries fixed in Sections 25-3-31 through 25-3-35 shall be the full and complete compensation for all public duties rendered by all public officers and public employees designated therein whatever the source of funds, whether appropriated from the State General Fund or allotted from federal funds received by the respective state agencies where such officers and employees are employed. All laws, parts of laws, regulations, or other authority which may have heretofore provided supplemental compensation or expenses of which no itemization therefor was made to the State Auditor of Public Accounts are hereby invalidated and held for naught.

In the event the Commissioner of Public Safety and the highway patrol chief are entitled to longevity pay as provided by law, this section shall not be construed to prohibit the payment thereof.

This section shall not be construed to affect employees of the Mississippi State Penitentiary, the Department of Mental Health and the Governor as pertains to housing, medical care, wholesale food purchases, and other financial benefits or emoluments as pertains to their state employment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6513; 1942, §§ 4175.8, 4176, 4178; Laws, 1932, ch. 333; Laws, 1970, ch. 402, § 5; Laws, 1989, ch. 328, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 7, 1989).

§ 25-3-38.
Payment of additional funds to appointive officials unlawful; penalty.

The salary for appointive and/or employed officials established herein shall be the total and complete salary, and it shall be unlawful for any additional funds to be paid from any source, including federal or private funds, to supplement salaries to a level in excess of that established herein. If any public officer or employee shall knowingly and wilfully violate the provisions of this section, he shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not more than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00), and in addition, shall vacate the office or position which he holds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 520, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 25-3-39.
Ceiling established for salaries; sources of funding for salaries; exemptions for Executive Director of Mississippi Development Authority, Governor’s Chief of Staff and certain professional public employees.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no public officer, public employee, administrator, or executive head of any arm or agency of the state, in the executive branch of government, shall be paid a salary or compensation, directly or indirectly, greater than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the salary fixed in Section 25-3-31 for the Governor, nor shall the salary of any public officer, public employee, administrator, or executive head of any arm or agency of the state, in the executive branch of government, be supplemented with any funds from any source, including federal or private funds. Such salaries shall be completely paid by the state. All academic officials, members of the teaching staffs and employees of the state institutions of higher learning, the Mississippi Community College Board, and community and junior colleges, and licensed physicians who are public employees, shall be exempt from this subsection. All professional employees who hold a bachelor’s degree or more advanced degree from an accredited four-year college or university or a certificate or license issued by a state licensing board, commission or agency and who are employed by the Department of Mental Health shall be exempt from this subsection if the State Personnel Board approves the exemption. The Commissioner of Child Protection Services is exempt from this subsection. From and after July 1, 2018, the Executive Director of the Public Employees’ Retirement System and the Chief Investment Officer of the Public Employees’ Retirement System shall be exempt from this subsection.

The Governor shall fix the annual salary of the Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority, the annual salary of the Commissioner of Child Protection Services, and the annual salary of the Chief of Staff of the Governor’s Office. The salary of the Governor’s Chief of Staff shall not be greater than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the salary of the Governor and shall be completely paid by the state without supplementation from another source. The salary of the Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority may be greater than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the salary of the Governor and may be supplemented with funds from any source, including federal or private funds; however, any state funds used to pay the salary of the Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority shall not exceed one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the salary of the Governor. If the executive director’s salary is supplemented with private funds, the Mississippi Development Authority shall publish on its website the amount of the supplement and the name of the donor of the private funds.

No public officer, employee or administrator shall be paid a salary or compensation, directly or indirectly, in excess of the salary authorized to be paid the executive head of the state agency or department in which he is employed. The State Personnel Board, based upon its findings of fact, may exempt physicians and actuaries from this subsection when the acquisition of such professional services is precluded based on the prevailing wage in the relevant labor market.

The executive head of any state agency or department appointed by the Governor, in such executive head’s discretion, may waive all or any portion of the salary or compensation lawfully established for the position.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4175.9; Laws, 1932, ch. 333; Laws, 1970, ch. 402, § 5; Laws, 1978, ch. 520, § 17; Laws, 1981, ch. 504, § 15; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 33; Laws, 1997, ch. 609, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 525, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 406, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 563, § 3; Laws, 2004, ch. 575, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 383, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 397, § 3; Laws, 2016, ch. 494, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 338, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 25-3-39.1.
Compensation of Deputy Commissioner of Insurance.

The compensation of the Deputy Commissioner of Insurance shall be fixed by the Commissioner of Insurance, subject to approval by the State Personnel Board, and shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 25-3-39.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 448, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 25-3-40.
Annual salary increases; intent to implement minimum wage and maximize salary increases.

On July 1, 1978, and each year thereafter, the Mississippi Compensation Plan shall be amended to provide salary increases in such amounts and percentages as might be recommended by the legislative budget office and as may be authorized by funds appropriated by the Legislature for the purpose of granting incentive salary increases as deemed possible dependent upon the availability of general and special funds.

It is hereby declared to be the intent of the Mississippi Legislature to implement the minimum wage as enacted by statutory law of the United States Congress subject to funds being available for that purpose. It is the intent and purpose of this section to maximize annual salary increases consistent with the availability of funds as might be determined by the Mississippi Legislature at its regular annual session and that all salary increases hereafter be made consistent with the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 520, § 8; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 168, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 25-3-41.
Traveling expenses of state officers and employees; travel services by commercial travel agency.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (10) of this section, when any officer or employee of the State of Mississippi, or any department, agency or institution thereof, after first being duly authorized, is required to travel in the performance of his official duties, the officer or employee shall receive as expenses for each mile actually and necessarily traveled, when the travel is done by a privately owned automobile or other privately owned motor vehicle, the mileage reimbursement rate allowable to federal employees for the use of a privately owned vehicle while on official travel.

When any officer or employee of any county or municipality, or of any agency, board or commission thereof, after first being duly authorized, is required to travel in the performance of his official duties, the officer or employee shall receive as expenses Twenty Cents (20¢) for each mile actually and necessarily traveled, when the travel is done by a privately owned motor vehicle; provided, however, that the governing authorities of a county or municipality may, in their discretion, authorize an increase in the mileage reimbursement of officers and employees of the county or municipality, or of any agency, board or commission thereof, in an amount not to exceed the mileage reimbursement rate authorized for officers and employees of the State of Mississippi in subsection (1) of this section.

Where two (2) or more officers or employees travel in one (1) privately owned motor vehicle, only one (1) travel expense allowance at the authorized rate per mile shall be allowed for any one (1) trip. When the travel is done by means of a public carrier or other means not involving a privately owned motor vehicle, then the officer or employee shall receive as travel expense the actual fare or other expenses incurred in such travel.

In addition to the foregoing, a public officer or employee shall be reimbursed for other actual expenses such as meals, lodging and other necessary expenses incurred in the course of the travel, subject to limitations placed on meals for intrastate and interstate official travel by the Department of Finance and Administration, provided, that the Legislative Budget Office shall place any limitations for expenditures made on matters under the jurisdiction of the Legislature. The Department of Finance and Administration shall set a maximum daily expenditure annually for such meals and shall notify officers and employees of changes to these allowances immediately upon approval of the changes. Travel by airline shall be at the tourist rate unless that space was unavailable. The officer or employee shall certify that tourist accommodations were not available if travel is performed in first class airline accommodations. Itemized expense accounts shall be submitted by those officers or employees in such number as the department, agency or institution may require; but in any case one (1) copy shall be furnished by state departments, agencies or institutions to the Department of Finance and Administration for preaudit or postaudit. The Department of Finance and Administration shall promulgate and adopt reasonable rules and regulations which it deems necessary and requisite to effectuate economies for all expenses authorized and paid pursuant to this section. Requisitions shall be made on the State Fiscal Officer who shall issue his warrant on the State Treasurer. Provided, however, that the provisions of this section shall not include agencies financed entirely by federal funds and audited by federal auditors.

Any officer or employee of a county or municipality, or any department, board or commission thereof, who is required to travel in the performance of his official duties, may receive funds before the travel, in the discretion of the administrative head of the county or municipal department, board or commission involved, for the purpose of paying necessary expenses incurred during the travel. Upon return from the travel, the officer or employee shall provide receipts of transportation, lodging, meals, fees and any other expenses incurred during the travel. Any portion of the funds advanced which is not expended during the travel shall be returned by the officer or employee. The Department of Audit shall adopt rules and regulations regarding advance payment of travel expenses and submission of receipts to ensure proper control and strict accountability for those payments and expenses.

No state or federal funds received from any source by any arm or agency of the state shall be expended in traveling outside of the continental limits of the United States until the governing body or head of the agency makes a finding and determination that the travel would be extremely beneficial to the state agency and obtains a written concurrence thereof from the Governor, or his designee, and the Department of Finance and Administration. However, employees of state institutions of higher learning may expend funds for travel outside of the continental limits of the United States upon a written finding by the president or head of the institution that the travel would be extremely beneficial to the institution.

Where any officer or employee of the State of Mississippi, or any department, agency or institution thereof, or of any county or municipality, or of any agency, board or commission thereof, is authorized to receive travel reimbursement under any other provision of law, the reimbursement may be paid under the provisions of this section or the other section, but not under both.

When the Governor, Lieutenant Governor or Speaker of the House of Representatives appoints a person to a board, commission or other position that requires confirmation by the Senate, the person may receive reimbursement for mileage and other actual expenses incurred in the performance of official duties before the appointment is confirmed by the Senate, as reimbursement for those expenses is authorized under this section.

The Department of Finance and Administration may contract with one or more commercial travel agencies, after receiving competitive bids or proposals therefor, for that travel agency or agencies to provide necessary travel services for state officers and employees. Municipal and county officers and municipal and county employees may also participate in the state travel agency contract and utilize these travel services for official municipal or county travel. However, the administrative head of each state institution of higher learning may, in his discretion, contract with a commercial travel agency to provide necessary travel services for all academic officials and staff of the university in lieu of participation in the state travel agency contract. Any such decision by a university to contract with a separate travel agency shall be approved by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning and the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

Before executing a contract with one or more travel agencies, the Department of Finance and Administration shall advertise for competitive bids or proposals once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a regular newspaper having a general circulation throughout the State of Mississippi. If the department determines that it should not contract with any of the bidders initially submitting proposals, the department may reject all those bids, advertise as provided in this paragraph and receive new proposals before executing the contract or contracts. The contract or contracts may be for a period not greater than three (3) years, with an option for the travel agency or agencies to renew the contract or contracts on a one-year basis on the same terms as the original contract or contracts, for a maximum of two (2) renewals. After the travel agency or agencies have renewed the contract twice or have declined to renew the contract for the maximum number of times, the Department of Finance and Administration shall advertise for bids in the manner required by this paragraph and execute a new contract or contracts.

Whenever any state officer or employee travels in the performance of his official duties by airline or other public carrier, he may have his travel arrangements handled by that travel agency or agencies. The amount paid for airline transportation for any state officer or employee, whether the travel was arranged by that travel agency or agencies or was arranged otherwise, shall not exceed the amount specified in the state contract established by the Department of Finance and Administration, Office of Purchasing and Travel, unless prior approval is obtained from the office.

For purposes of this subsection, the term “state agency” means any agency that is subject to oversight by the Bureau of Fleet Management of the Department of Finance and Administration under Section 25-1-77.

Each state agency shall use a trip optimizer type system developed and administered by the Department of Finance and Administration in computing the optimum method and cost for travel by state officers and employees using a motor vehicle where the travel will exceed one hundred (100) miles per day and the officer or employee is not driving a state-owned or state-leased vehicle that has been dedicated or assigned to the officer or employee.

The provisions of this subsection shall be used to determine the most cost-effective method of travel by motor vehicles, whether those vehicles are owned by the state agency, leased by the state agency, or owned by the officer or employee, and shall be applicable for purposes of determining the maximum authorized amount of any travel reimbursement for officers and employees of those agencies related to vehicle usage.

The maximum authorized amount of travel reimbursement related to motor vehicle usage shall be the lowest cost option as determined by the trip optimizer type system. All travel claims submitted for reimbursement shall include the results of the trip optimizer type system indicating the lowest cost option for travel by the state officer or employee.

In providing a calculation of rates, the trip optimizer type system shall account for the distance that an officer or employee must travel to pick up a rental or state fleet vehicle, and shall account for the long-term rate discounts offered through the state purchasing contract for vehicle rentals.

This subsection shall not apply to travel by state officials in motor vehicles driven by the official or in vehicles used for the transport of the official. The exemption in this paragraph (f) applies only to the state official and not to the staff or other employees of the state official. As used in this paragraph (f), “state official” means statewide elected officials and the elected members of the Public Service Commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4061-01; Laws, 1950, ch. 448, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 335; Laws, 1962, ch. 491; Laws, 1970, ch. 400,§ 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 303; Laws, 1978, ch. 487, § 1(1); Laws, 1980, ch. 502; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 169; Laws, 1985, ch. 455, § 5; Laws, 1986, ch. 500, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 320, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 612, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 571, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 581, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 440, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 630, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 310, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 425, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 537, § 4; Laws, 2017, ch. 409, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 25-3-43.
Travel expenses of judiciary.

When any chancery judge, county judge or circuit judge shall be required to travel in the performance of his official duties, such judge shall receive as expenses of such travel the mileage allowance and a reimbursement for other actual and necessary expenses incurred in such travel as provided for public officers and employees in Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972. This shall be the entire travel allowances or travel expenses received by such judges.

Chancery judges and circuit judges shall direct requests for reimbursement for the travel expenses authorized pursuant to this section to the Supreme Court and the Supreme Court shall submit such requests to the Department of Finance and Administration.

The Supreme Court shall have the power to adopt rules and regulations regarding the administration of travel expenses authorized pursuant to this section.

In any county in which is located a State Penitentiary, the board of supervisors, in order to compensate the justice court judges who are required to travel to the State Penitentiary, is authorized to reimburse justice court judges’ mileage in the amount authorized by Section 25-3-41, but not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per month, such monies to be paid from the general county fund of such county.

In addition to the regular salary provided by Section 25-3-35 and the mileage reimbursement provided by Section 25-3-41, each Supreme Court Justice and each judge of the Court of Appeals shall receive an expense allowance as specified in this subsection. The expense allowance shall be equal to the maximum daily expense rate allowable to employees of the federal government for travel in the high rate geographical area of Jackson, Mississippi, as may be established by federal regulations, per day, for each day while actually attending to judicial duties in Jackson, Mississippi, not to exceed twenty (20) days per month.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 1653.9, 4175.5; Laws, 1966, ch. 445, § 2; Laws, 1970, ch. 334, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 402, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 373, § 4; Laws, 1992, ch. 360, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after July 6, 1999 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the amendment of this section).

§ 25-3-45.
Penalty for excessive travel expenses.

It shall be unlawful for any person to claim, receive, approve, or allow any item of expense for official travel in excess of that authorized by Section 25-3-41.

If any person shall knowingly and wilfully violate any of the provisions of said section, such person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) and, in addition, shall be removed from the office or position which he holds. Such person shall also be civilly liable for the full amount of the expense account illegally received, allowed, or approved by him, and the person receiving same shall be so liable whether the violation be wilful or not.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 4061-05, 4061-10; Laws, 1950, ch. 448, §§ 5, 10.

§ 25-3-47.
Department subordinates.

Unless otherwise expressly fixed or provided by law, the heads of the departments hereinabove enumerated shall each select and appoint his or their respective subordinates, and may at any time remove a subordinate and appoint his successor; and the subordinate shall perform such duties as shall be prescribed by the said head or heads of his department. Unless as to a particular subordinate, some other form of oath is prescribed by law, every subordinate shall take and subscribe an oath well and faithfully to perform all the duties incumbent upon him, which oath shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6514; 1942, § 4179.

§ 25-3-49.
Salaries in special appointments.

In case of the death, resignation, or removal from office of any of the officers mentioned in Section 25-3-47, the person elected or appointed, temporarily or permanently, to fill such vacancy shall, from the time he shall enter upon the discharge of his official duties, receive the compensation authorized by this chapter, and at the same rate for any period of time less than one (1) year, and for so long as the person shall serve as such officer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3953; 1906, § 4477; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7270; 1930, § 6515; 1942, § 4180.

§ 25-3-51.
Deduction for absence from the state.

Any officer of this state who receives a salary may, when the duties of his office will best permit, be absent from the state not more than one (1) month in any one (1) year without any deduction from his salary; but the state treasurer, the secretary of state, and auditor of public accounts shall, while absent, leave their offices so attended as to produce no injury to persons having business in said offices. If any officer who receives a salary shall be absent from the state without the consent of the governor for a longer time than one (1) month in any one (1) year, he shall be subject to a pro rata deduction from his salary for the length of time he shall be absent more than one (1) month; and, on his return, before he shall be entitled to any warrant on the treasury for his salary or any part thereof thereafter accruing, he shall make oath to the number of days he shall have been absent beyond one month and file the same in the office of the auditor of public accounts; and it shall be the duty of the auditor to deduct twice the number of days so sworn to from the time for which the salary of such officer may be estimated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3956; 1906, § 4480; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7273; 1930, § 6518; 1942, § 4183.

§ 25-3-53.
Compensation of special judges of circuit, county, or chancery courts.

When a special commission shall issue for the holding of a term of any circuit, county or chancery court by a special judge, or for the trial or hearing by such officer of any case in any such court because of the disqualification or disability of the judge or chancellor thereof (or where, because of the disqualification of the judge or chancellor, the attorneys involved have agreed upon a member of the bar to preside as special judge), the special judge shall receive compensation as provided in Section 9-1-105, for the time he shall serve as such, and the Fiscal Management Board shall issue its warrant therefor on the certificate of the clerk of the court in which the services were rendered for the time served.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3954; 1906, § 4478; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7271; 1930, § 6516; 1942, § 4181; Laws, 1948, ch. 222; Laws, 1952, ch. 236; Laws, 1971, ch. 348, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 587, § 5, eff from and after April 25, 1989 (became law without the Governor’s signature).

§ 25-3-55.
Compensation of special judge of Supreme Court.

When a special judge or special judges shall be commissioned to preside in any cause in the Supreme Court, or during any term thereof or during the disability or disqualification of any of the judges of said court, such special judge or judges shall each be entitled to the compensation provided for in Section 9-1-105. Each judge so serving shall make out an itemized account of the number of days he in good faith served, and make affidavit to same and file it with the Clerk of the Supreme Court. The said clerk shall issue a certificate showing the length of time such special judge or judges served, and the Fiscal Management Board shall issue its warrant therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3955; 1906, § 4479; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7272; 1930, § 6517; 1942, § 4182; Laws, 1964, ch. 424; Laws, 1989, ch. 587, § 6, eff from and after April 25, 1989 (became law without the Governor’s signature).

§ 25-3-57.
Deduction for absence from court.

In case any judge of the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals or of a circuit court or chancery court shall fail to attend at any term of court which either of them is required by law to hold, or in case the Attorney General or any district attorney shall fail to attend at any court which he is required to attend officially, it shall be the duty of the clerk of such court to certify the number of days such judge, chancellor, Attorney General, or district attorney was absent at each term of the court to the Auditor of Public Accounts, who shall deduct twice the number of days so certified from the time for which the salary of such officer may be estimated, unless such officer shall make oath, and file the same in the Auditor’s office, that his absence was occasioned by sickness of himself or his family, or that his attendance was prevented by high water, the prevalence of an epidemic or contagious disease, or by accident not within his control.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3957; 1906, § 4481; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7274; 1930, § 6519; 1942, § 4184; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 34, eff July 13, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 25-3-59.
Deduction for absence from meeting of public service commission.

In case a public service commissioner shall fail to attend at any meeting or session of the public service commission appointed for the transaction of business, he shall be subject to a pro rata deduction from his salary; and the executive secretary of said commission or, in his absence, the commissioner or commissioners present shall certify to the auditor of public accounts the number of days such commissioner was absent at each meeting or session. The auditor shall deduct twice the number of days so certified from the time for which the salary of such commissioner may be estimated, unless such commissioner shall make and file an affidavit in the auditor’s office that his absence was occasioned by sickness of himself or a member of his family, or by the prevalence of an epidemic or a contagious disease, or by means not within his control.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3959; 1906, § 4483; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7276; 1930, § 6521; 1942, § 4186.

§ 25-3-61.
Governor may grant leave of absence.

The Governor may grant leave of absence for a time not to exceed three (3) months in the year to any officer at a time when the duties of his office will admit of the absence without injury to the public service; but a judge, district attorney, and the attorney general shall not have a leave of absence which will interfere with his presence at any term of court at which he should be present. Nor shall a public service commissioner have a leave of absence which will interfere with his presence at any session or meeting of the public service commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3960; 1906, § 4484; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7277; 1930, § 6522; 1942, § 4187.

§ 25-3-63.
Local governmental entities and local school districts authorized to grant administrative leave with pay to their employees in the event of extreme weather conditions or man-made or natural disasters or emergencies

From and after March 14, 2020, the board of supervisors of any county, the governing authority of any municipality and the local school board of any public school district may grant administrative leave with pay during the affected period within the affected county, municipality or school district to the employees of such governmental entities on a local or statewide basis in the event of extreme weather conditions or in the event of a man-made, technological or natural disaster or emergency, if such event has resulted in an emergency declaration by the Governor. Any employee on a previously approved leave during the affected period shall be eligible for such administrative leave granted by the governing authority, and shall not be charged for his or her previously approved leave during the affected period.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2020, HB1647, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 2020).

§ 25-3-65.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1976, ch. 490. § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§25-3-65. [Codes, 1942, § 4187-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 223; 1975, ch. 486, § 1]

§ 25-3-67.
Deductions from municipal employees’ salaries for contributions for United Way, insurance, and United States Savings Bonds.

The governing authorities of any municipality may, within their discretion, deduct from the salary of any individual municipal employee an amount to be deposited with the municipal credit union, contributions for the United Way, life, health-and-accident insurance and United States Savings Bonds, if a request for such deductions is made in writing by the employee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 480, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1976).

§ 25-3-69.
Uniform per diem compensation for officers and employees of state boards, commissions and agencies.

Unless otherwise provided by law, all officers and employees of state agencies, boards, commissions, departments and institutions authorized by law to receive per diem compensation for each day or fraction thereof occupied with the discharge of official duties shall be entitled to Forty Dollars ($40.00) per diem compensation. When the Governor, Lieutenant Governor or Speaker of the House of Representatives appoints a person to a board, commission or other position that requires confirmation by the Senate, the person may receive per diem compensation for the performance of official duties before such appointment is confirmed by the Senate, as such per diem compensation is authorized under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 560, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 440, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 310, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-3-71.
Annual report of recommendations of salary increases and amounts.

The State Personnel Board shall prepare a written legislative report to be submitted to the members of the Mississippi Legislature on December 1, 1988, and on December 1 of every year thereafter, making recommendations on any salary increases and the amounts deemed necessary for all state and county elected officials and state appointed officials whose salaries are established by statute.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 528, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 25-3-73.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2000, ch. 581, § 1, eff from and after passage May 20, 2000.

[Laws, 1997, ch. 572, § 4; Laws, 1998, ch. 591, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1998).]